si_LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 587 Y 1
SFX 587 0 පත .
SFX 4657 Y 1
SFX 4657 0 පද .
SFX 1726 Y 1
SFX 1726 0 පන .
SFX 2632 Y 1
SFX 2632 0 කාරයන්ට .
SFX 995 Y 1
SFX 995 0 පය .
SFX 1723 Y 1
SFX 1723 0 පර .
SFX 912 Y 1
SFX 912 0 පල .
SFX 3648 Y 1
SFX 3648 0 ූන් .
SFX 4114 Y 1
SFX 4114 0 ස්වන .
SFX 1189 Y 1
SFX 1189 0 පස .
SFX 4113 Y 1
SFX 4113 0 ස්වල .
SFX 4647 Y 1
SFX 4647 0 පහ .
SFX 1334 Y 1
SFX 1334 0 පළ .
SFX 4923 Y 1
SFX 4923 0 ජිත් .
SFX 2032 Y 1
SFX 2032 0 ප් .
SFX 1496 Y 1
SFX 1496 0 පා .
SFX 1495 Y 1
SFX 1495 0 පි .
SFX 3236 Y 1
SFX 3236 0 පී .
SFX 351 Y 1
SFX 351 0 පු .
SFX 4627 Y 1
SFX 4627 0 පෙ .
SFX 1720 Y 1
SFX 1720 0 පේ .
SFX 3253 Y 1
SFX 3253 0 පතියකු .
SFX 2204 Y 1
SFX 2204 0 ුවන්ගෙන් .
SFX 2116 Y 1
SFX 2116 0 ගයක් .
SFX 1903 Y 1
SFX 1903 0 ිං .
SFX 4574 Y 1
SFX 4574 0 මවත් .
SFX 1342 Y 1
SFX 1342 0 නයේදී .
SFX 730 Y 1
SFX 730 0 වෙත් .
SFX 147 Y 1
SFX 147 0 ික .
SFX 893 Y 1
SFX 893 0 වෙති .
SFX 422 Y 1
SFX 422 0 ිට .
SFX 378 Y 1
SFX 378 0 ිණ .
SFX 2015 Y 1
SFX 2015 0 යෑමට .
SFX 335 Y 1
SFX 335 0 ිත .
SFX 1553 Y 1
SFX 1553 0 කයින්ට .
SFX 1271 Y 1
SFX 1271 0 ිද .
SFX 366 Y 1
SFX 366 0 ින .
SFX 2250 Y 1
SFX 2250 0 ිඳ .
SFX 497 Y 1
SFX 497 0 ිම .
SFX 4130 Y 1
SFX 4130 0 සෙහි .
SFX 52 Y 1
SFX 52 0 ිය .
SFX 3797 Y 1
SFX 3797 0 ිර .
SFX 625 Y 1
SFX 625 0 ිල .
SFX 687 Y 1
SFX 687 0 ිනුත් .
SFX 2460 Y 1
SFX 2460 0 මානය .
SFX 410 Y 1
SFX 410 0 ්වීම .
SFX 1792 Y 1
SFX 1792 0 ්වීය .
SFX 4695 Y 1
SFX 4695 0 න්දැයි .
SFX 516 Y 1
SFX 516 0 ිව .
SFX 3770 Y 1
SFX 3770 0 ිස .
SFX 3541 Y 1
SFX 3541 0 ්තාය .
SFX 2643 Y 1
SFX 2643 0 ්සෙන් .
SFX 3206 Y 1
SFX 3206 0 මාන් .
SFX 3171 Y 1
SFX 3171 0 යෑමේ .
SFX 372 Y 1
SFX 372 0 කටත් .
SFX 3346 Y 1
SFX 3346 0 තේත් .
SFX 1196 Y 1
SFX 1196 0 නවද .
SFX 1505 Y 1
SFX 1505 0 නවල .
SFX 2110 Y 1
SFX 2110 0 ගිරි .
SFX 4052 Y 1
SFX 4052 0 ාකොට .
SFX 2107 Y 1
SFX 2107 0 ගෙයි .
SFX 241 Y 1
SFX 241 0 නවා .
SFX 2898 Y 1
SFX 2898 0 ාලයක් .
SFX 991 Y 1
SFX 991 0 මටයි .
SFX 4197 Y 1
SFX 4197 0 වේල් .
SFX 4522 Y 1
SFX 4522 0 යකින්වත් .
SFX 564 Y 1
SFX 564 0 වමින් .
SFX 1973 Y 1
SFX 1973 0 වමිනි .
SFX 624 Y 1
SFX 624 0 ුණත් .
SFX 3989 Y 1
SFX 3989 0 ාරම් .
SFX 1541 Y 1
SFX 1541 0 ගත්ත .
SFX 4994 Y 1
SFX 4994 0 කොන් .
SFX 1361 Y 1
SFX 1361 0 ගත්හ .
SFX 680 Y 1
SFX 680 0 ුයි .
SFX 4375 Y 1
SFX 4375 0 ලිවල .
SFX 2014 Y 1
SFX 2014 0 යෙකුගෙන් .
SFX 192 Y 1
SFX 192 0 ුයේ .
SFX 2666 Y 1
SFX 2666 0 ්මකින් .
SFX 3235 Y 1
SFX 3235 0 පුම් .
SFX 2372 Y 1
SFX 2372 0 වාන් .
SFX 3045 Y 1
SFX 3045 0 වානේ .
SFX 2519 Y 1
SFX 2519 0 නාවක .
SFX 2743 Y 1
SFX 2743 0 ුවන්නට .
SFX 2055 Y 1
SFX 2055 0 නාවට .
SFX 1648 Y 1
SFX 1648 0 ළුව .
SFX 1668 Y 1
SFX 1668 0 වාදීහු .
SFX 2527 Y 1
SFX 2527 0 නයන්ගෙන් .
SFX 2441 Y 1
SFX 2441 0 යවල් .
SFX 4153 Y 1
SFX 4153 0 සියත් .
SFX 1851 Y 1
SFX 1851 0 ුවන්නේ .
SFX 2518 Y 1
SFX 2518 0 නාවූ .
SFX 4939 Y 1
SFX 4939 0 ග්‍රෑම් .
SFX 549 Y 1
SFX 549 0 කරමින් .
SFX 3443 Y 1
SFX 3443 0 කරමිනි .
SFX 4309 Y 1
SFX 4309 0 වරණයෙන් .
SFX 1968 Y 1
SFX 1968 0 වලියට .
SFX 2806 Y 1
SFX 2806 0 ියාවෙන් .
SFX 3374 Y 1
SFX 3374 0 ණයන්ගෙන් .
SFX 3094 Y 1
SFX 3094 0 වටයි .
SFX 2625 Y 1
SFX 2625 0 කාර්ය .
SFX 3332 Y 1
SFX 3332 0 දානය .
SFX 474 Y 1
SFX 474 0 කමට .
SFX 1967 Y 1
SFX 1967 0 වලියේ .
SFX 4383 Y 1
SFX 4383 0 ලිංගම් .
SFX 159 Y 1
SFX 159 0 කම් .
SFX 4025 Y 1
SFX 4025 0 ාදීමට .
SFX 1123 Y 1
SFX 1123 0 කමේ .
SFX 4024 Y 1
SFX 4024 0 ාදීමේ .
SFX 3175 Y 1
SFX 3175 0 යවන .
SFX 2098 Y 1
SFX 2098 0 ණයකින් .
SFX 3392 Y 1
SFX 3392 0 ගැසී .
SFX 1025 Y 1
SFX 1025 0 ුවන්ගේ .
SFX 2154 Y 1
SFX 2154 0 ්වන්න .
SFX 4940 Y 1
SFX 4940 0 ග්‍රහණය .
SFX 3415 Y 1
SFX 3415 0 කූල .
SFX 1860 Y 1
SFX 1860 0 ුනොත් .
SFX 1671 Y 1
SFX 1671 0 වශයෙන් .
SFX 3698 Y 1
SFX 3698 0 ුමයි .
SFX 4731 Y 1
SFX 4731 0 නින්ම .
SFX 3335 Y 1
SFX 3335 0 දහසක .
SFX 4251 Y 1
SFX 4251 0 වැවේ .
SFX 4314 Y 1
SFX 4314 0 වමට .
SFX 2552 Y 1
SFX 2552 0 දහස් .
SFX 3848 Y 1
SFX 3848 0 ිදින .
SFX 3333 Y 1
SFX 3333 0 දහසේ .
SFX 1006 Y 1
SFX 1006 0 තාවයන් .
SFX 1972 Y 1
SFX 1972 0 වම් .
SFX 3071 Y 1
SFX 3071 0 වමු .
SFX 3994 Y 1
SFX 3994 0 ාමෙන් .
SFX 4350 Y 1
SFX 4350 0 වංසයෙහි .
SFX 4508 Y 1
SFX 4508 0 යන්ගේද .
SFX 3018 Y 1
SFX 3018 0 වේදීහු .
SFX 1653 Y 1
SFX 1653 0 සින් .
SFX 4154 Y 1
SFX 4154 0 සිනි .
SFX 3355 Y 1
SFX 3355 0 තික .
SFX 4022 Y 1
SFX 4022 0 ාදෙන .
SFX 1341 Y 1
SFX 1341 0 නවලට .
SFX 4639 Y 1
SFX 4639 0 පායි .
SFX 909 Y 1
SFX 909 0 යින්ගෙන් .
SFX 644 Y 1
SFX 644 0 තිය .
SFX 2265 Y 1
SFX 2265 0 ිකයෙක් .
SFX 3032 Y 1
SFX 3032 0 විමට .
SFX 2266 Y 1
SFX 2266 0 ිකයෙකි .
SFX 3888 Y 1
SFX 3888 0 ිකයෙකු .
SFX 972 Y 1
SFX 972 0 වූහ .
SFX 2310 Y 1
SFX 2310 0 ාංගයක් .
SFX 4937 Y 1
SFX 4937 0 ඟු .
SFX 359 Y 1
SFX 359 0 රත්න .
SFX 1241 Y 1
SFX 1241 0 ොට .
SFX 3580 Y 1
SFX 3580 0 ොඩ .
SFX 3901 Y 1
SFX 3901 0 ෑවක් .
SFX 4259 Y 1
SFX 4259 0 වැඩියාව .
SFX 3578 Y 1
SFX 3578 0 ොර .
SFX 1581 Y 1
SFX 1581 0 ොව .
SFX 4564 Y 1
SFX 4564 0 මාරු .
SFX 3395 Y 1
SFX 3395 0 ගාරයක් .
SFX 1752 Y 1
SFX 1752 0 ත්වීම .
SFX 3882 Y 1
SFX 3882 0 ිකවම .
SFX 4782 Y 1
SFX 4782 0 දුක් .
SFX 42 Y 1
SFX 42 0 න්ට .
SFX 998 Y 1
SFX 998 0 න්ඩ .
SFX 611 Y 1
SFX 611 0 න්ත .
SFX 200 Y 1
SFX 200 0 න්ද .
SFX 177 Y 1
SFX 177 0 න්න .
SFX 274 Y 1
SFX 274 0 න්ම .
SFX 430 Y 1
SFX 430 0 න්ය .
SFX 1042 Y 1
SFX 1042 0 ින්නට .
SFX 794 Y 1
SFX 794 0 න්ව .
SFX 1403 Y 1
SFX 1403 0 ින්නේ .
SFX 1325 Y 1
SFX 1325 0 යයන් .
SFX 3913 Y 1
SFX 3913 0 ැවීමෙන් .
SFX 480 Y 1
SFX 480 0 ාවෙන් .
SFX 2930 Y 1
SFX 2930 0 ාධිකරණය .
SFX 2567 Y 1
SFX 2567 0 තැනට .
SFX 2382 Y 1
SFX 2382 0 වරයාත් .
SFX 751 Y 1
SFX 751 0 ත්වයකින් .
SFX 498 Y 1
SFX 498 0 ැති .
SFX 4592 Y 1
SFX 4592 0 මක්වත් .
SFX 1207 Y 1
SFX 1207 0 තැන් .
SFX 338 Y 1
SFX 338 0 වන්ගෙන් .
SFX 2541 Y 1
SFX 2541 0 දෙණියේ .
SFX 2171 Y 1
SFX 2171 0 ්ටත් .
SFX 4275 Y 1
SFX 4275 0 වාදිය .
SFX 1556 Y 1
SFX 1556 0 කත්වයෙන් .
SFX 3662 Y 1
SFX 3662 0 ුවාක් .
SFX 3145 Y 1
SFX 3145 0 රැස් .
SFX 4280 Y 1
SFX 4280 0 වාගත .
SFX 3454 Y 1
SFX 3454 0 කත්වයට .
SFX 2005 Y 1
SFX 2005 0 රයකට .
SFX 2537 Y 1
SFX 2537 0 දේශයේ .
SFX 4172 Y 1
SFX 4172 0 සයේදී .
SFX 3482 Y 1
SFX 3482 0 ්වරුන් .
SFX 897 Y 1
SFX 897 0 වාගේ .
SFX 738 Y 1
SFX 738 0 රයක් .
SFX 4441 Y 1
SFX 4441 0 රයකි .
SFX 1699 Y 1
SFX 1699 0 රයකු .
SFX 732 Y 1
SFX 732 0 වූවන් .
SFX 1894 Y 1
SFX 1894 0 ින්ගේ .
SFX 1772 Y 1
SFX 1772 0 චාර .
SFX 4384 Y 1
SFX 4384 0 ලාභියා .
SFX 1593 Y 1
SFX 1593 0 ුස් .
SFX 1268 Y 1
SFX 1268 0 ියටත් .
SFX 3240 Y 1
SFX 3240 0 පිටින් .
SFX 2013 Y 1
SFX 2013 0 යෙක්ද .
SFX 2012 Y 1
SFX 2012 0 යෙක්ම .
SFX 3024 Y 1
SFX 3024 0 වූවාට .
SFX 2477 Y 1
SFX 2477 0 බිමක් .
SFX 1102 Y 1
SFX 1102 0 දීද .
SFX 3023 Y 1
SFX 3023 0 වූවාය .
SFX 158 Y 1
SFX 158 0 දීම .
SFX 285 Y 1
SFX 285 0 දීය .
SFX 1095 Y 1
SFX 1095 0 බිම .
SFX 2039 Y 1
SFX 2039 0 පත්වල .
SFX 4660 Y 1
SFX 4660 0 පත්වී .
SFX 1795 Y 1
SFX 1795 0 ්වයෙන් .
SFX 3880 Y 1
SFX 3880 0 ිකාවෙන් .
SFX 3010 Y 1
SFX 3010 0 ශාලාවල .
SFX 2574 Y 1
SFX 2574 0 තරයක් .
SFX 700 Y 1
SFX 700 0 ලමින් .
SFX 4379 Y 1
SFX 4379 0 ලියකට .
SFX 856 Y 1
SFX 856 0 නයන් .
SFX 1655 Y 1
SFX 1655 0 සයක් .
SFX 2168 Y 1
SFX 2168 0 ්ඩ් .
SFX 1312 Y 1
SFX 1312 0 ලියක් .
SFX 3546 Y 1
SFX 3546 0 ්ඩා .
SFX 3836 Y 1
SFX 3836 0 ින්නැයි .
SFX 1319 Y 1
SFX 1319 0 යාවක් .
SFX 4827 Y 1
SFX 4827 0 ත්තා .
SFX 4826 Y 1
SFX 4826 0 ත්තේ .
SFX 3315 Y 1
SFX 3315 0 ද්‍රව්‍ය .
SFX 3164 Y 1
SFX 3164 0 යෙකින් .
SFX 174 Y 1
SFX 174 0 ෙත් .
SFX 576 Y 1
SFX 576 0 ෙති .
SFX 800 Y 1
SFX 800 0 තෙන් .
SFX 3111 Y 1
SFX 3111 0 ලුත් .
SFX 1561 Y 1
SFX 1561 0 ්සන් .
SFX 1204 Y 1
SFX 1204 0 ත්වයත් .
SFX 533 Y 1
SFX 533 0 වීමටත් .
SFX 3434 Y 1
SFX 3434 0 කාමි .
SFX 1785 Y 1
SFX 1785 0 කාමී .
SFX 1497 Y 1
SFX 1497 0 පල් .
SFX 1568 Y 1
SFX 1568 0 ්වලටත් .
SFX 2623 Y 1
SFX 2623 0 කාලීනව .
SFX 343 Y 1
SFX 343 0 සිරි .
SFX 1932 Y 1
SFX 1932 0 සෙයි .
SFX 2305 Y 1
SFX 2305 0 ාටම .
SFX 1348 Y 1
SFX 1348 0 තොට .
SFX 4555 Y 1
SFX 4555 0 මිතා .
SFX 432 Y 1
SFX 432 0 ඩ් .
SFX 1007 Y 1
SFX 1007 0 ඩා .
SFX 861 Y 1
SFX 861 0 ඩි .
SFX 2591 Y 1
SFX 2591 0 ඩු .
SFX 4898 Y 1
SFX 4898 0 ඩේ .
SFX 3375 Y 1
SFX 3375 0 ඩෝ .
SFX 2101 Y 1
SFX 2101 0 ටුවේ .
SFX 1171 Y 1
SFX 1171 0 වරුන්ගෙන් .
SFX 4099 Y 1
SFX 4099 0 හයි .
SFX 4868 Y 1
SFX 4868 0 තයකින් .
SFX 3363 Y 1
SFX 3363 0 තනයේ .
